Nevada, session 83, SB359.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 484A of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A hearing conducted pursuant to NRS 484A.7041 must be
conducted by a court having jurisdiction of the offense, as
specified in NRS 484A.750, in accordance with the provisions of
this section and any rules adopted by the Nevada Supreme Court.
2. At a hearing conducted pursuant to NRS 484A.7041:
(a) The court, the defendant, the attorney for the defendant, if
any, and the prosecuting attorney, if any, have the right to
subpoena witnesses in accordance with applicable court rules.
(b) Oral evidence may be taken only upon oath or affirmation.
(c) Every party has the right to:
(1) Call and examine witnesses;
(2) Introduce exhibits relevant to the issues of the case;
(3) Cross-examine opposing witnesses on any matters
relevant to the issues of the case, even though the matter was not
covered in a direct examination;
(4) Impeach any witness regardless of which party first
called the witness to testify; and
(5) Offer rebuttal evidence.
3. A hearing conducted pursuant to NRS 484A.7041 is an
informal proceeding. The court:
(a) Shall liberally construe the rules relating to evidence at any
such hearing; and
(b) May admit evidence if the court determines that the
evidence has probative value to a fact at issue in the case.
4. The court may:
(a) Conduct a hearing by telephone, audiovisual means or
other electronic means.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
(b) Permit a party or witness residing outside of the judicial
district in which the court is located to testify by telephone,
audiovisual means or other electronic means.
Sec. 2. NRS 484A.7033 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484A.7033 1. Except as otherwise provided by law, a peace
officer in this State who has reasonable cause to believe that a
person has violated a provision of chapters 483 to 484E, inclusive,
486 or 490 of NRS that is a civil infraction may halt and detain the
person as is reasonably necessary to investigate the alleged violation
and issue a civil infraction citation for the alleged violation. A peace
officer who has halted and detained a person pursuant to this section
may also:
(a) Detain the person in accordance with NRS 171.123 if
circumstances exist that warrant such a detention;
(b) Search the person to ascertain the presence of a weapon in
accordance with NRS 171.1232 and take any other action authorized
pursuant to that section or any other provision of law; and
(c) Arrest the person in accordance with NRS 171.1231 if
probable cause for the arrest exists.
2. [If] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, if a
person is arrested [pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 1] or
cited for [an] a misdemeanor offense [that arises out of] arising
from the same facts and circumstances as [the] a violation for
which a civil infraction [and] citation is [punishable as a
misdemeanor,] issued, the [offense] court may, upon motion of
either party or on its own motion, consolidate the criminal
complaint and the civil infraction [may be included in] at any stage
of the [same] proceedings. In a consolidated hearing:
(a) The rules governing the criminal complaint [.] apply, except
that the court must determine whether a civil infraction was
committed based on a preponderance of the evidence, as provided
in subsection 5 of NRS 484A.7041.
(b) If the defendant is represented by an attorney appointed to
provide indigent defense services for the criminal complaint, the
hearing must be bifurcated, and the attorney for the defendant
must not be required to represent the defendant during the portion
of the hearing addressing the civil infraction.
3. If a misdemeanor offense and a civil infraction are
included in the same criminal complaint or are consolidated
pursuant to subsection 2, the court must consider the evidence and
render judgment for both the misdemeanor offense and the civil
infraction at the same hearing.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
4. The provisions of subsection 2 that authorize the court to
consolidate a misdemeanor offense and a civil infraction do not
apply if the court has entered an order finding that the person
committed the civil infraction pursuant to subsection 4 of
NRS 484A.704.
5. A consolidated hearing conducted pursuant to this section
must be conducted by the court without a jury.
Sec. 3. NRS 484A.7035 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484A.7035 1. When a person is halted by a peace officer in
this State for any violation of chapters 483 to 484E, inclusive, 486
or 490 of NRS that is a civil infraction, or a prosecuting attorney
elects to treat a violation of chapters 483 to 484E, inclusive, 486 or
490 of NRS that is punishable as a misdemeanor instead as a civil
infraction in accordance with NRS 484A.7049, the peace officer or
prosecuting attorney, as applicable, may prepare a civil infraction
citation manually or electronically in the form of a complaint
issuing in the name of “The State of Nevada,” containing : [, except
as otherwise provided in paragraph (a) of subsection 2 of
NRS 484A.7049:]
(a) A statement that the citation represents a determination by a
peace officer or prosecuting attorney that a civil infraction has been
committed by the person named in the citation and that the
determination will be final unless contested as provided in NRS
484A.703 to 484A.705, inclusive;
(b) A statement that a civil infraction is not a criminal offense;
(c) The name, date of birth, residential address and mailing
address, if different from the residential address, telephone number
and electronic mail address of the person who is being issued the
citation and an indication as to whether the person has agreed to
receive communications relating to the civil infraction by text
message;
(d) The state registration number of the person’s vehicle, if any;
(e) The number of the person’s driver’s license, if any;
(f) The civil infraction for which the citation was issued;
(g) The personnel number or other unique agency identification
number of the peace officer issuing the citation and the address and
phone number of the agency which employs the peace officer or, if a
prosecuting attorney is issuing the citation, the personnel number or
other unique agency identification number of the peace officer who
halted the person for the violation or the volunteer appointed
pursuant to NRS 484B.470 who issued the citation and the address
and phone number of the agency which employs the peace officer or
volunteer, preprinted or printed legibly on the citation;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
(h) A statement of the options provided pursuant to NRS
484A.703 to 484A.705, inclusive, for responding to the citation and
the procedures necessary to exercise these options;
(i) A statement that, at any hearing to contest the determination
set forth in the citation, the facts that constitute the infraction must
be proved by a preponderance of the evidence and the person may
subpoena witnesses, including, without limitation, the peace officer
or duly authorized member or volunteer of a traffic enforcement
agency who issued the citation or halted the person; and
(j) A statement that the person must respond to the citation as
provided in NRS 484A.703 to 484A.705, inclusive, within 90
calendar days.
2. A peace officer who issues a civil infraction citation
pursuant to subsection 1 shall sign the citation and deliver a copy of
the citation to the person charged with the civil infraction. If the
citation is prepared electronically, the peace officer shall sign
the copy of the citation that is delivered to the person charged with
the violation.
3. A civil infraction citation may be served by delivering a
copy of the citation to the person charged with the civil infraction
pursuant to this section . [or NRS 484A.7049.] The acceptance of a
civil infraction citation by the person charged with the civil
infraction shall be deemed personal service of the citation and a
copy of the citation signed by the peace officer or prosecuting
attorney, as applicable, constitutes proof of service. If a person
charged with a civil infraction refuses to accept a civil infraction
citation, the copy of the citation signed by the peace officer or
prosecuting attorney, as applicable, constitutes proof of service.
Sec. 4. NRS 484A.7041 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484A.7041 1. If, pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS 484A.704,
a person receiving a civil infraction citation requests a hearing to
contest the determination that the person has committed the civil
infraction set forth in the citation, the hearing must be conducted in
accordance with this section.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, before a
hearing to contest the determination that a person has committed a
civil infraction, the court shall require the person to post a bond
[equal to] or deposit cash with the court. The court shall fix the
amount of the bond or cash deposit at not more than the amount of
the full payment of the monetary penalty, the administrative
assessment and any fees specified in the civil infraction citation. [In
lieu of posting such a bond, the person may instead deposit cash
with the court in the amount of the bond required pursuant to this
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
subsection.] Any bond posted or cash deposited with the court
pursuant to this subsection must be forfeited upon the court’s
finding that the person committed the civil infraction. Any person
whom the court determines is unable to pay the costs of defending
the action or is a client of a program for legal aid in accordance with
NRS 12.015 must not be required to post a bond or deposit cash
with the court in accordance with this subsection.
3. The person who requested the hearing may, at his or her
expense, be represented by counsel . [, and a city attorney or district
attorney,] A prosecuting attorney may, in his or her discretion [and
as applicable,] , represent the plaintiff. If counsel appears on
behalf of the person who requested the hearing, that person is not
required to attend [may represent] the hearing and is deemed to
have stipulated to his or her identity as the [plaintiff.] person who
received the civil infraction citation.
4. A hearing conducted pursuant to this section must be
conducted by the court without a jury. In lieu of the personal
appearance at the hearing by the peace officer who issued the civil
infraction citation, the court may consider the information contained
in the civil infraction citation and any other written statement
submitted under oath by the peace officer. If the court has
established a system pursuant to NRS 484A.615, the peace officer
may, if authorized by the court, use the system to submit such a
statement. [The person named in the civil infraction citation may
subpoena witnesses, including, without limitation, the peace officer
who issued the citation, and has the right to present evidence and
examine witnesses present in court.]
5. After consideration of the evidence and argument, the court
shall determine whether a civil infraction was committed by the
person named in the civil infraction citation. The court must find by
a preponderance of the evidence that the person named in the civil
infraction citation committed a civil infraction. If the peace officer
who issued the civil infraction citation fails to appear in person or
submit a written statement as described in subsection 4, the court
must dismiss the citation unless other evidence, including, without
limitation, the information in the citation or testimony from other
witnesses, sufficiently establishes that the civil infraction was
committed by the person named in the citation. If [it has] the court
does not [been established] find by a preponderance of the evidence
that the infraction was committed by the person named in the
citation, the court must enter an order dismissing the civil infraction
citation in the court’s records. If [it has been established] the court
finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the infraction was
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
committed, the court must enter in the court’s records an order
pursuant to NRS 484A.7043.
6. An appeal from the court’s determination or order may be
taken in the same manner as any other civil appeal from a municipal
court or justice court, as applicable, except that:
(a) The notice of appeal must be filed not later than 7 calendar
days after the court enters in the court’s records an order pursuant to
NRS 484A.7043;
(b) If the appellant is the person charged with the civil
infraction, any bond required to be given by the appellant in order to
secure a stay of execution of the order of the court during the
pendency of the appeal must equal the amount of the monetary
penalty and administrative assessments which the court has ordered
the appellant to pay pursuant to NRS 484A.7043. Any bond must be
forfeited if the order of the court is affirmed on appeal; and
(c) If a prosecuting attorney does not represent the plaintiff
during the proceedings in the justice court or municipal court, the
appellate court shall review the record and any arguments presented
by the person charged with the civil infraction and render a decision.
Sec. 4.5. NRS 484A.7043 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
484A.7043 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a
person who is found to have committed a civil infraction shall be
punished by a civil penalty of not more than $500 per violation
unless a greater civil penalty is authorized by specific statute.
Except as otherwise provided in NRS 484A.792, any civil penalty
collected pursuant to NRS 484A.703 to 484A.705, inclusive, by a:
(a) Municipal court must be paid to [:
(a) The] the treasurer of the city in which the [civil infraction
occurred; or
(b) If the civil infraction did not occur in a city,] court is
located.
(b) Justice court must be paid to the treasurer of the county in
which the [civil infraction occurred.] court is located.
2. If a person is found to have committed a civil infraction, in
addition to any civil penalty imposed on the person, the court shall
order the person to pay the administrative assessments set forth in
NRS 176.059, 176.0611, 176.0613 and 176.0623 in the amount that
the person would be required to pay if the civil penalty were a fine
imposed on a defendant who pleads guilty or guilty but mentally ill
or is found guilty or guilty but mentally ill of a misdemeanor. If, in
lieu of a civil penalty, the court authorizes a person to successfully
complete a course of traffic safety approved by the Department of
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
Motor Vehicles, the court must order the person to pay the amount
of the administrative assessment that corresponds to the civil penalty
for which the defendant would have otherwise been responsible.
The administrative assessments imposed pursuant to this subsection
must be collected and distributed in the same manner as the
administrative assessments imposed and collected pursuant to NRS
176.059, 176.0611, 176.0613 and 176.0623.
3. If the court determines that a civil penalty or administrative
assessment imposed pursuant to this section is:
(a) Excessive in relation to the financial resources of the
defendant, the court may waive or reduce the monetary penalty
accordingly.
(b) Not within the defendant’s present financial ability to pay,
the court may enter into a payment plan with the person.
4. A court having jurisdiction over a civil infraction pursuant to
NRS 484A.703 to 484A.705, inclusive, may:
(a) In addition to ordering a person who is found to have
committed a civil infraction to pay a civil penalty and administrative
assessments pursuant to this section, order the person to successfully
complete a course of traffic safety approved by the Department of
Motor Vehicles.
(b) Waive or reduce the civil penalty that a person who is found
to have committed a civil infraction would otherwise be required to
pay if the court determines that any circumstances warrant such a
waiver or reduction.
(c) Reduce any moving violation for which a person was issued
a civil infraction citation to a nonmoving violation if the court
determines that any circumstances warrant such a reduction.
5. A court shall not award attorney’s fees or costs to any
party in a hearing conducted pursuant to NRS 484A.7041,
regardless of the outcome.
Sec. 5. NRS 484A.7049 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484A.7049 [1.] A prosecuting attorney may elect to treat a
violation of a provision of chapters 483 to 484E, inclusive, 486 or
490 of NRS that is punishable as a misdemeanor, other than a
violation of NRS 484C.110 or 484C.120, as a civil infraction
pursuant to NRS 484A.703 to 484A.705, inclusive.
[2. The prosecuting attorney shall make the election described
in subsection 1 on or before the time scheduled for the first
appearance of the defendant by:
(a) Preparing a civil infraction citation in accordance with
subsection 1 of NRS 484A.7035 that contains all applicable
information that is known to the prosecuting attorney, signing the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
citation and filing the citation with a court having jurisdiction over
the alleged offense or with its traffic violations bureau;
(b) Filing notice of the prosecuting attorney’s election with the
court having jurisdiction of the underlying criminal charge; and
(c) Delivering a copy of the notice and citation to the defendant.
3. Upon the filing of a notice pursuant to paragraph (b) of
subsection 2, the court shall dismiss the underlying criminal charge.]
Sec. 6. NRS 484A.705 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484A.705 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if a
person commits a violation of a provision of chapters 483 to 484E,
inclusive, 486 or 490 of NRS that is punishable as a civil infraction
[while] and the person is also charged with driving under the
influence of alcohol or a controlled substance, the [person] civil
infraction may instead be charged [with] as a misdemeanor.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, if a civil
infraction is charged as a misdemeanor pursuant to subsection 1,
the charge must be reduced to a civil infraction if the charge of
driving under the influence of alcohol or a controlled substance is
dismissed. The provisions of this subsection do not apply if the
dismissal occurs pursuant to a plea agreement.
Sec. 7. NRS 484B.600 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484B.600 1. It is unlawful for any person to drive or operate
a vehicle of any kind or character at:
(a) A rate of speed greater than is reasonable or proper, having
due regard for the traffic, surface and width of the highway, the
weather and other highway conditions.
(b) Such a rate of speed as to endanger the life, limb or property
of any person.
(c) A rate of speed greater than that posted by a public authority
for the particular portion of highway being traversed.
(d) A rate of speed that results in the injury of another person or
of any property.
(e) In any event, a rate of speed greater than 80 miles per hour.
2. If, while violating any provision of subsection 1, the driver
of a motor vehicle is the proximate cause of a collision with a
pedestrian or a person riding a bicycle, an electric bicycle or an
electric scooter, the driver is subject to the additional penalty set
forth in subsection 4 of NRS 484B.653.
3. A person who violates any provision of subsection 1 may be
subject to the additional penalty set forth in NRS 484B.130 or
484B.135.
4. Except as otherwise provided by law, if a person is issued a
traffic citation for a violation of any provision of subsection 1, the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
court may, in its discretion, reduce the violation from a moving
traffic violation to a violation that is not a moving traffic violation [.
There is a presumption in favor of reducing the violation] if the
person :
(a) Admits to committing the violation and pays the entire
amount of the fine and all fees due on or before the date on which
the person is first required to make an appearance relating to the
citation [, whether by personal appearance or through] ; and
(b) Provides the court with a copy of his or her [counsel, but
such a presumption may be overcome] driving record.
5. The court shall not reduce a violation pursuant to
subsection 4 if the driving record of the person demonstrates a
pattern of moving traffic violations.
[5.] 6. Any fine imposed pursuant to paragraph (a), (b), (c) or
(e) of subsection 1 must not exceed $20 for each mile per hour a
person travels above the posted speed limit or the proper rate of
speed at which the person should be traveling, as applicable. The
provisions of this subsection apply regardless of whether a person
pays the entire amount of the fine and all fees due in accordance
with subsection 4.
[6.] 7. Except as otherwise provided in subsection [7,] 8, a
person who commits a violation of any provision of this section that
causes physical injury to a person or damage to property shall be
punished by a civil penalty of not more than $1,000.
[7.] 8. A person who commits a violation of any provision of
this section and, at the time the violation was committed, was
operating a vehicle at a rate of speed that was 30 miles per hour or
more over that posted by a public authority is guilty of a
misdemeanor.
9. As used in this section, “driving record” means a record
of:
(a) Each conviction for a traffic offense that occurred within
the immediately preceding 10 years;
(b) Each finding that a person committed a civil infraction
within the immediately preceding 10 years; and
(c) Each citation issued to a person for a moving traffic
violation that was subsequently reduced to a nonmoving violation
within the immediately preceding 10 years.
Sec. 8. NRS 484E.020 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484E.020 1. The driver of any vehicle involved in a crash on
a highway or premises to which the public has access resulting
only in damage to a vehicle or other property which is driven or
attended by any person shall:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
(a) Immediately stop his or her vehicle at the scene of the crash;
and
(b) If the driver’s vehicle is creating a hazard or obstructing
traffic and can be moved safely, move the vehicle or cause the
vehicle to be moved out of the traffic lanes of the roadway to a safe
location that does not create a hazard or obstruct traffic and, if
applicable, safely fulfill the requirements of NRS 484E.030.
2. A person who violates this section is guilty of a
misdemeanor.
Sec. 9. NRS 484E.030 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484E.030 1. The driver of any vehicle involved in a crash on
a highway or premises to which the public has access resulting in
injury to or death of any person or damage to any vehicle or other
property which is driven or attended by any person shall:
(a) Give his or her name, address and the registration number of
the vehicle the driver is driving, and shall upon request and if
available exhibit his or her license to operate a motor vehicle to any
person injured in such crash or to the driver or occupant of or person
attending any vehicle or other property damaged in such crash;
(b) Give such information and upon request manually surrender
such license to any police officer at the scene of the crash or who is
investigating the crash; and
(c) Render to any person injured in such crash reasonable
assistance, including the carrying, or the making of arrangements for
the carrying, of such person to a physician, surgeon or hospital for
medical or surgical treatment if it is apparent that such treatment is
necessary, or if such carrying is requested by the injured person.
2. If no police officer is present, the driver of any vehicle
involved in [such] a crash described in subsection 1, after fulfilling
all other requirements of subsection 1 and NRS 484E.010, insofar as
possible on his or her part to be performed, shall , if the crash
resulted in injury to or death of any person or occurred on a
highway, forthwith report [such] the crash to the nearest office of a
police authority or of the Nevada Highway Patrol and submit thereto
the information specified in subsection 1.
3. A person who violates this section is guilty of a
misdemeanor.
Sec. 10. NRS 484E.040 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484E.040 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
the driver of any vehicle which is involved in a crash on a highway
or premises to which the public has access with any vehicle or
other property which is unattended, resulting in any damage to such
other vehicle or property, shall immediately stop and shall then and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
there locate and notify the operator or owner of such vehicle or
other property of the name and address of the driver and owner of
the vehicle striking the unattended vehicle or other property or shall
attach securely in a conspicuous place in or on such vehicle or
property a written notice giving the name and address of the driver
and of the owner of the vehicle doing the striking.
2. If the vehicle of a driver involved in a crash pursuant to
subsection 1 is creating a hazard or obstructing traffic and can be
moved safely, the driver shall, before meeting the requirements of
subsection 1, move the vehicle or cause the vehicle to be moved out
of the traffic lanes of the roadway to a safe location that does not
create a hazard or obstruct traffic and minimizes interference with
the free movement of traffic.
3. A person who violates this section is guilty of a
misdemeanor.
Sec. 11. NRS 484E.050 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484E.050 1. The driver of a vehicle which is involved in a
crash on a highway with any vehicle or other property which is
unattended, resulting in any damage to such other vehicle or
property, shall immediately by the quickest means of
communication give notice of such crash to the nearest office of a
police authority or of the Nevada Highway Patrol.
2. Whenever the driver of a vehicle is physically incapable of
giving an immediate notice of a crash as required in subsection 1
and there was another occupant in the vehicle at the time of the
crash capable of doing so, such occupant shall make or cause to be
given the notice not given by the driver.
3. A person who violates this section is guilty of a
misdemeanor.
Sec. 12. Chapter 244 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
In addition to any other authority granted pursuant to this
chapter, the board of county commissioners may, by ordinance,
impose a civil penalty in lieu of a criminal penalty for a violation
of a county ordinance, unless state law expressly prohibits the
imposition of a civil penalty or prescribes a criminal penalty for
the same act or omission.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)